North Carolina, session 2025, HB793.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of Fayetteville to establish an
Innovation District, which will be established in a geographic location within the City to foster
economic growth and collaboration by bringing together various entities such as educational
institutions, businesses, universities, and start-ups in a concentrated area. The City of Fayetteville
will collaborate with Fayetteville State University and other local entities to establish the joint
venture to stimulate economic activities for the area residents and institutions in Cumberland
County, which is a tier one county.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of
Fayetteville to consolidate the City's and Cumberland County's 911 Emergency Dispatch Center
to support the region's effort to ensure public safety, emergency services, and medical care.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Hollywood Heights
Community Club's Community Center, a nonprofit organization, for facility repairs and
maintenance.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in recurring funds
for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide a directed grant to the City of
Fayetteville to provide equal funding to support the following fire stations:
(1) Fayetteville Lake Rim Fire Station.
(2) Fayetteville Fire Station 3.
(3) Fayetteville Fire Station 15.
(4) Fayetteville Fire Station 14.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
*H793-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide a directed grant to the City of
Fayetteville for maintenance and trail development at Lake Rim Park.
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 793-First Edition